Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB776.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1605.1(c) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1605.1. Assessment of Civic Knowledge.--* * *(a.1) Beginning in the 2028-2029 school year and each school year thereafter, in order to graduate from high school or obtain a general equivalency diploma, a student shall correctly answer at least sixty per centum (60%) of the questions on the assessment under subsection (a)(1).* * *12345678910111213141516171819 (c) A student with an individualized education program shall not be required to take the assessment administered under subsection (a)(1) or meet the graduation requirement under subsection (a.1) if the provisions of the student's individualized education program indicate otherwise.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0776PN0798 - 2 - 1234567